Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1609
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act shall relieve a telecommunications or communications provider from the requirements in section 86-124.

Laws 2025, LB311, § 9.